src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-jeaell_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jeäll u-stem dlo: # Noun - full paradigm
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom: jeäll
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill: jiâlˈlu
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc: jeälast
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Ess: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Par: jeällad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe: [jeältää, jeältaa]
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen: jeälai
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com: jeälaivuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe: [jeälaitää, jeälaitaa]
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: jeällam
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: jeällad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: jeällas
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: jeällam
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: jeällad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: jeällaz
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: jeälas
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: jeälaz
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: jeälas
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: jeälaz
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: jeälˈlsan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: jeälˈlsad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: jeälˈlses
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: jeälˈlseem
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: jeälˈlseed
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: jeälˈlseez
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: jeäˈlstan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: jeäˈlstad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: jeäˈlstes
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: jeäˈlsteen
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: jeäˈlsteed
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: jeäˈlsteez

     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: jeälainan
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: jeälainad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: jeälaines
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: jeälainen
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: jeälained
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: jeälainez
     
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: jeällantää
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: jeäladtää
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: jeälastää
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: jeällantää
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: jeäladtää
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: jeälaztää
     
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxSg1: jeälˈlnan
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxSg2: jeälˈlnad
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxSg3: jeälˈlnes
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxPl1: jeälˈlneen
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxPl2: jeälˈlneed
     jeäll+N+Ess+PxPl3: jeälˈlneez
#     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: jeälas
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: jeälad
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: jeälaz
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: jeälään
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: jeälääd
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: jeälees
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: jeäleen
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: jeäleed
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: jeäleez
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: jeälään
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: jeälääd
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: jeälees
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: jeäleen
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: jeäleed
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: jeäleez
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: jeälään
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: jeälääd
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: jeälees
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: jeäleen
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: jeäleed
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: jeäleez
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: jeälainan
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: jeälainad
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: jeälaines
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: jeälainen
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: jeälained
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: jeälainez
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: jeäläänvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: jeäläädvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: jeäleesvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: jeäleenvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: jeäleedvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: jeäleezvuiʹm
     
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: jeälääntää
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: jeäläädtää
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: jeäleestää
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: jeäleentää
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: jeäleedtää
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: jeäleeztää
     
#
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [jeälaž, jiâluž]
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: jiâlu
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: jiâluž
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: [jeällže, jiâllže]
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: jiâlust
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: jiâlun
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: jiâlutää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ess: [jeälžen, jiâlžen]
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Par: [jeälžed, jiâlžed]

     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: jiâlu
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: jiâlui
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: jiâluid
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: jiâluid
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: jiâluin
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: jiâluivuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: jiâluitää

     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: jeälžam
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: jeälžad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: jeälžes
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: jeälžeem
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: jeälžeed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: jeälžeez
     
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: jeälžan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: jeälžad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: jeälžes
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: jeälžeen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: jeälžeed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: jeälžeez
     
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: jeälžan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: jeälžad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: jeälžes
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: jeälžeen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: jeälžeed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: jeälžeez

     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: jeälžasan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: jeälžasad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: jeälžasas
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: jeälžeʹsen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: jeälžeʹsed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: jeälžeʹsez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: jiâˈlstan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: jiâˈlstad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: jiâˈlstes
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: jiâˈlsteen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: jiâˈlsteed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: jiâˈlsteez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: jiâlinan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: jiâlinad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: jiâlines
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: jiâlineen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: jiâlineed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: jiâlineez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: jeälžantää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: jeälžadtää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: jeälžestää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: jeälžeentää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: jeälžeedtää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: jeälžeeztää

#     
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: jeälžan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: jeälžad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: jeälžes
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: jeälžeen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: jeälžeed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: jeälžeez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: jiâlään
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: jiâlääd
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: jiâlees
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: jiâleen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: jiâleed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: jiâleez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: jiâlään
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: jiâlääd
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: jiâlees
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: jiâleen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: jiâleed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: jiâleez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: jiâlään
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: jiâlääd
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: jiâlees
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: jiâleen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: jiâleed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: jiâleez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: jiâluinan
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: jiâluinad
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: jiâluines
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: jiâluineen
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: jiâluineed
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: jiâluineez
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: jiâläänvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: jiâläädvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: jiâleesvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: jiâleenvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: jiâleedvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: jiâleezvuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: jiâlääntää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: jiâläädtää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: jiâleestää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: jiâleentää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: jiâleedtää
     jeäll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: jiâleeztää
